Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 10

Tennessee Anti-Slapp Act of 1997

4-21-1001. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Anti-Slapp Act of 1997.”

Acts 1997, ch. 403, § 1.

4-21-1002. Legislative intent and findings.

It is the intent of the general assembly to provide protection for individuals who make good faith reports of wrongdoing to appropriate governmental bodies. Information provided by citizens concerning potential misdeeds is vital to effective law enforcement and the efficient operation of government.

The general assembly finds that the threat of a civil action for damages in the form of a “strategic lawsuit against political participation” (SLAPP), and the possibility of considerable legal costs, can act as a deterrent to citizens who wish to report information to federal, state, or local agencies. SLAPP suits can effectively punish concerned citizens for exercising the constitutional right to speak and petition the government for redress of grievances.

Acts 1997, ch. 403, § 2.

4-21-1003. Immunity from SLAPP suits — Exceptions — Costs.

Any person who in furtherance of such person's right of free speech or petition under the Tennessee or United States Constitution in connection with a public or governmental issue communicates information regarding another person or entity to any agency of the federal, state or local government regarding a matter of concern to that agency shall be immune from civil liability on claims based upon the communication to the agency.

The immunity conferred by this section shall not attach if the person communicating such information:

Knew the information to be false;

Communicated information in reckless disregard of its falsity; or

Acted negligently in failing to ascertain the falsity of the information if such information pertains to a person or entity other than a public figure.

A person prevailing upon the defense of immunity provided for in this section shall be entitled to recover costs and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in establishing the defense.

Acts 1997, ch. 403, § 3.

4-21-1004. Intervention by agency or attorney general and reporter.

In order to protect the free flow of information from citizens to their government, an agency receiving a complaint or information under § 4-21-1003 may intervene and defend against any suit precipitated by the communication to the agency. In the event that a local government agency does not intervene in and defend against a suit arising from any communication protected under this part, the office of the attorney general and reporter may intervene in and defend against the suit.

An agency prevailing upon the defense of immunity provided for in § 4-21-1003 shall be entitled to recover costs and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in establishing the defense. If the agency fails to establish such defense, the party bringing such action shall be entitled to recover from the agency costs and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in proving the defense inapplicable or invalid.

Acts 1997, ch. 403, § 4.

4-21-904. Discrimination by funded programs prohibited.